src/phon-sme.xfst
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ===================================== !
! Phonological converter for North Sámi !
! ===================================== !

! To eventual curious readers
! This file tries out conversion from Sámi orthography to a phonetic
! translation based upon IPA. There is a switch at the end to get 
! different formats: SAMPA, Fenno-Ugric transcription or Finnish
! orthography.

! Usage: Compile sme as usual:
! make GTLANG=sme
! Pipe text through the analyser:
! cat text | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT bin/phon-sme.fst | ..

!We may also add POS tagging:
! cat corp/pedkorpus.txt | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/pos-sme.fst | tr '\t' '+' | cut -d"+" -f1,3 | uniq | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sme.fst | cut -f2 | l

! In order to make this better we should uniq the closed POS before giving them
! to the phonological analyser (TODO: Check whether output is ok).

! We might also add syllable boundaries. Here the simple version:
!cat corp/pedkorpus.txt | preprocess | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sme.fst | cut -f2 | lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sme.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' '  | see

! echo "dat lea 123" | preprocess | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/sme-num.fst | cut -f2 |
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/hyphrules-sme.fst | cut -f2 | 
! lookup -flags mbTT -utf8 bin/phon-sme.fst | cut -f2 | tr '\n' ' ' | l


!echo <<defining POS tags...>>
!
!define POSTAG %+N -> %+N,
!              %+A -> %+A, 
!              %+V -> %+V,
!              %+Adv -> %+X, 
!              %+Pron -> %+X,
!              %+CS -> %+X,
!              %+CC -> %+X,
!              %+Adp -> %+X,
!              %+Po -> %+X,
!              %+Pr -> %+X,
!              %+Interj -> %+X,
!              %+Pcle -> %+X,
!              %+Num -> %+X, 
!              %+CLB -> %+CLB ;


echo <<defining Vow and Cns...>>



define Vow       [ a | á | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å | ä | ö | 
                   A | Á | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å | Ä | Ö | 
                   é | ó | ú | í | à | è | ò | ù | ì | ë | ü | ï | 
                   â | ê | ô | û | î | ã | ý |
                   É | Ó | Ú | Í | À | È | Ò | Ù | Ì | Ë | Ü | Ï | 
                   Â | Ê | Ô | Û | Î | Ã | Ý |
                   ɑ | ə | ă | ĕ | ĭ | ŭ | ŏ |
                   ː ] ;

define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | 
             B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | 
             p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž |   
             P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž |
             ɟ | ʎ | ʃ | ː ] ;

define Sgm [ Vow | Cns ] ;

define Stop [ p | t | k | c | č ] ;

define Alv [ t | T | d | D | ŧ | Ŧ | đ | Đ | s | S | l | L | r | R | n | N ] ;

define Son [ m | n | ŋ | l | r | j | v | đ ] ;

define Nas [ m | M | n | N | ŋ | Ŋ ] ;

! ^SL = Secondary Lengthening
define Dummy %^SL ;

define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* (Dummy) Cns* (ə) %^ ;


! PrimStress always on first syllable:
define PrimStress [..] -> ˈ || .#. Cns* _ Vow ;

! SecStress after word boundary:
define WordInitSecStress  [..] -> ˌ || [ %# | %- ] Cns* _ Vow  ;
! giella#skuvla -> giel^la#skuv^la -> kˈiella#skˌuvla
! Dihtti^oalgi  -> Diht^ti^oal^gi  -> tˈihtiˌŏɑləki

! SecStress according to foot structure, first occurence:
define FootStructSecStress1  [..] -> ˌ ||  ˈ Vow+ Cons* %^ Syll Cns* _ Vow ;
! gulahallama  -> gu^la^hal^la^ma  -> kˈulahˌallama

! SecStress according to foot structure, second occurence:
define FootStructSecStress2  [..] -> ˌ || ˌ Vow+ Cons* %^ Syll Cns* _ Vow+ Cns* %^ ;

! giella#gulahallama -> giel^la#gu^la^hal^la^ma -> kˈiella#kˌulahˌallama

! SecStress according to foot structure, non-first and non-second occurences:
define FootStructSecStress3  [..] -> ˌ || ˌ Vow+ Cons* %^ Syll Cns* _ Vow+ Syll ;

! gulahallameaset -> gu^la^hal^la^mea^set -> kˈulahˌallamˌĕæseh
! ráidarasažiiddisguin -> rái^da^ra^sa^žiid^dis^guin -> rˈájtarˌasadʃˌijtisguin


! giella#gulahallameaset -> giel^la#gu^la^hal^la^mea^set -> kˈiella#kˌulahˌallamˌĕæseh
! giella#ráidarasažiiddisguin -> giel^la#rái^da^ra^sa^žiid^dis^guin -> kˈiella#rˌájtarˌasadʃˌijtisguin


! SecondaryLenghtening

echo << Downcasing rules>>

define down [ A -> a, Á -> á, B -> b, C -> c, Č -> č, Ç -> ç, D -> d, Đ -> đ,
              E -> e, É -> é, F -> f, G -> g, H -> h, I -> i, Í -> í, J -> j,
              K -> k, L -> l, M -> m, N -> n, Ŋ -> ŋ, O -> o, Ò -> ò, Ó -> ó,
              P -> p, Q -> q, R -> r, S -> s, Š -> š, T -> t, Ŧ -> ŧ, Þ -> þ,
              U -> u, Ü -> ü, V -> v, W -> w, X -> x, Y -> y, Z -> z, Ž -> ž,
              Æ -> æ, Ø -> ø, Å -> å, Ö -> ö, Ä -> ä  ] ;




echo << Rules >>


! Here comes the other rules

define ijRule  i -> j || Vow _ ;

define slRule  s -> š || [.#.|%#|%-] _ l ;

define snjRule s -> š || [.#.|%#|%-] _ n j ;

define StrongGrade    m %^ b     -> m m %^ p     ,
                      m %^ p     -> m m %^ M p   ,
                      m %^ s     -> m m %^ s     ,
                      m %^ v     -> m m %^ v     ,
                      m %^ š     -> m m %^ š     ,
                      
                      s %^ p     -> s s %^ p     ,
                      s %^ t     -> s s %^ t     ,
                      s %^ k     -> s s %^ k     ,
                      s %^ m     -> s s %^ m     ,
                      
                      š %^ p     -> š š %^ p     ,
                      š %^ t     -> š š %^ t     ,
                      š %^ k     -> š š %^ k     ,
                      š %^ m     -> š š %^ m     ,
                      
                      n %^ c     -> n n %^ N t s ,
                      n %^ d     -> n n %^ t     ,
                      ŋ %^ g     -> ŋ ŋ %^ k     ,
                      n %^ g     -> ŋ ŋ %^ k     ,
                      n %^ j     -> n n %^ j     ,
                      n %^ n j   -> n j %^ n j   ,
                      ŋ %^ k     -> ŋ ŋ %^ Ŋ k   ,
                      n %^ k     -> ŋ ŋ %^ Ŋ k   ,
                      n %^ s     -> n n %^ s     ,
                      n %^ t     -> n n %^ N t   ,
                      n %^ v     -> n n %^ v     ,   
                      n %^ z     -> n n %^ t s   ,
                      n %^ č     -> n n %^ N t š ,
                      n %^ š     -> n n %^   š   ,
                      n %^ ž     -> n n %^   t š ,
                      l %^ r     -> l ə %^   r   ,
                      l %^ b     -> l ə %^   p   ,   
                      l %^ f     -> l ə %^   f   ,   
                      l %^ g     -> l ə %^   k   ,   
                      l %^ k     -> l ə %^ h k   , 
                      l %^ p     -> l ə %^ h p   ,   
                      l %^ s     -> l ə %^   s   ,   
                      l %^ v     -> l ə %^   v   ,   
                      l %^ š     -> l ə %^   š   ,
                      l %^ j     -> ʎ   %^ ʎ     , 
                      l %^ l j   -> ʎ ʎ %^ ʎ     ,
                      l %^ z     -> l l %^ d s   , 
                      l %^ ž     -> l l %^ d š   , 
                      l %^ t     -> l l %^ L t   ,
                      l %^ d     -> l l %^   t   ,
                      l %^ c     -> l l %^ L t s ,
                      l %^ č     -> l l %^ L t š ,
                      l %^ s k   -> l l %^ s k   ,
                      
                    h l %^ l     -> L   %^  L    ,
                    h r %^ r     -> R   %^  R    ,
                      
                      v %^ l     -> w w %^ l     ,
                      v %^ d     -> w w %^ t     ,
                      v %^ g     -> w w %^ k     ,
                      v %^ p     -> w w %^ W p   ,
                      v %^ j     -> w w %^ j     ,
                      v %^ k     -> w w %^ W k   ,
                      v %^ r     -> w w %^ r     ,
                      v %^ h l   -> w w %^ L     ,
                      v %^ t     -> w w %^ W t   ,
                      v %^ s k   -> w w %^ s k   ,   
                      v %^ z     -> w w %^ t s   ,
                      v %^ d n j -> w w %^ t n j ,
                      v %^ d n   -> w w %^ t n   ,
                      v %^ ž     -> w w %^ t š   ,
                      v %^ s t   -> w w %^ s t   ,


                      j %^ r     -> j j %^     r ,
                      j %^ b     -> j j %^     p ,   
                      j %^ f     -> j j %^     f ,   
                      j %^ g     -> j j %^     k , 
                      j %^ l     -> j j %^     l ,   
                      j %^ k     -> j j %^   J k , 
                      j %^ p     -> j j %^   J p ,   
                      j %^ s     -> j j %^     s ,   
                      j %^ v     -> j j %^     v ,   
                      j %^ h l   -> j j %^     L , 
                      j %^ z     -> j j %^   d s , 
                      j %^ h m   -> j j %^     M , 
                      j %^ t     -> j j %^   J t ,
                      j %^ d     -> j j %^     t ,
                      j %^ c     -> j j %^ J t s ,
                      j %^ h n   -> j j %^     N ,
                      j %^ s t   -> j j %^   s t ,
                      j %^ s k   -> j j %^   s k ,

                      r %^ b     -> r ə %^     p ,
                      r %^ d     -> r ə %^     t ,
                      r %^ f     -> r ə %^     f ,
                      r %^ g     -> r ə %^     k ,
                      r %^ j     -> r ə %^     j ,
                      r %^ k     -> r ə %^   h k ,
                      r %^ p     -> r ə %^   h p ,
                      r %^ s     -> r ə %^     s ,
                      r %^ t     -> r ə %^   h t ,
                      r %^ v     -> r ə %^     v ,
                      r %^ š     -> r ə %^     š ,
                      r %^ z     -> r ə %^   d s ,
                      r %^ ž     -> r ə %^   d š ,
                      r %^ c     -> r ə %^ h t s ,
                      r %^ č     -> r ə %^ h t š ,
        
                      đ %^ b     -> đ ə %^     p ,
                      đ %^ g     -> đ ə %^     k ,
                      đ %^ j     -> đ ə %^     j ,
                      đ %^ v     -> đ ə %^     v
                               || [.#.|%#|%-] (Syll Syll) Cns* Vow+ _ Vow ;

define olju l %^ j -> l ə %^ j || [.#.|%#|%^] (s) o _ u , 
                                  [.#.|%#|%^]  p  u _ a  ,
								  [.#.|%#|%^]  b  u _ o  ;

define FinalLightT t -> h ||          _ .#. ;
define FinalLightD d -> h || Vow  j   _ .#. ;

define sClusterWeak s p %^ p   ->   s %^ p     || Vow _ Vow ,, 
                    s t %^ t   ->   s %^ t     || Vow _ Vow ,,
                    s k %^ k   ->   s %^ k     || Vow _ Vow ,,
                    s m %^ m   ->   s %^ m     || Vow _ Vow ,, 
                    š p %^ p   ->   š %^ p     || Vow _ Vow ,, 
                    š t %^ t   ->   š %^ t     || Vow _ Vow ,,
                    š k %^ k   ->   š %^ k     || Vow _ Vow ,,
                    š m %^ m   ->   š %^ m     || Vow _ Vow ; 
